North Dakota, session 69, HB1078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-01-44 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-01-44. Reimbursement of certain medical expenses for North Dakota national guard
members while on state active duty.
The North Dakota national guard is authorized to pay medical expenses for national guard
members who are called to state active duty when the member sustains an injury or illness that is found
to have occurred within the line of duty and is not covered by workforce safety and insurance and when
such treatment occurred while on state active duty. Payments shall be made only for costs not covered
by other health insurance. Coverage of qualifying medical expenses is subject to rules set forth by the
office of the adjutant general and subject to available funds.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1078 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1078 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State